lib/hunspell-1.2.10/src/tools/dics/si_LK/dictionaries/si-LK.aff
FLAG num
SFX 4020 Y 1
SFX 4020 0 ණාත්මක .
SFX 2128 Y 1
SFX 2128 0 ණේය .
SFX 1027 Y 1
SFX 1027 0 ින්නට .
SFX 4301 Y 1
SFX 4301 0 ්ලක .
SFX 4320 Y 1
SFX 4320 0 ්‍රයන් .
SFX 1003 Y 1
SFX 1003 0 ්ලට .
SFX 2074 Y 1
SFX 2074 0 පැහැ .
SFX 4290 Y 1
SFX 4290 0 ්ලය .
SFX 1343 Y 1
SFX 1343 0 ින්නේ .
SFX 4629 Y 1
SFX 4629 0 ේශයකින් .
SFX 4569 Y 1
SFX 4569 0 ්කඩේ .
SFX 936 Y 1
SFX 936 0 ිකත්වය .
SFX 1002 Y 1
SFX 1002 0 ්ලා .
SFX 1758 Y 1
SFX 1758 0 ්ලි .
SFX 2185 Y 1
SFX 2185 0 ්ලු .
SFX 756 Y 1
SFX 756 0 ්ලේ .
SFX 4277 Y 1
SFX 4277 0 ්ලෝ .
SFX 2549 Y 1
SFX 2549 0 ලස් .
SFX 3283 Y 1
SFX 3283 0 ාමක් .
SFX 3631 Y 1
SFX 3631 0 රුවෙන් .
SFX 686 Y 1
SFX 686 0 ජනක .
SFX 3379 Y 1
SFX 3379 0 ස්තර .
SFX 1959 Y 1
SFX 1959 0 වැදී .
SFX 4120 Y 1
SFX 4120 0 කාලීනව .
SFX 1254 Y 1
SFX 1254 0 තුමාට .
SFX 3020 Y 1
SFX 3020 0 ෙකදී .
SFX 1950 Y 1
SFX 1950 0 වෙතැයි .
SFX 4102 Y 1
SFX 4102 0 කූල .
SFX 784 Y 1
SFX 784 0 වූවන් .
SFX 442 Y 1
SFX 442 0 ාවත් .
SFX 1170 Y 1
SFX 1170 0 ාවතී .
SFX 3028 Y 1
SFX 3028 0 ූන් .
SFX 447 Y 1
SFX 447 0 වත්ත .
SFX 1202 Y 1
SFX 1202 0 වත්ම .
SFX 1426 Y 1
SFX 1426 0 තියට .
SFX 1200 Y 1
SFX 1200 0 වත්ව .
SFX 4361 Y 1
SFX 4361 0 ්‍යතා .
SFX 2734 Y 1
SFX 2734 0 තික .
SFX 2340 Y 1
SFX 2340 0 ිකරුවන් .
SFX 610 Y 1
SFX 610 0 තිය .
SFX 2803 Y 1
SFX 2803 0 කොටගෙන .
SFX 2029 Y 1
SFX 2029 0 යාවත් .
SFX 1850 Y 1
SFX 1850 0 ියාවට .
SFX 385 Y 1
SFX 385 0 ක්වත් .
SFX 2308 Y 1
SFX 2308 0 ියාවේ .
SFX 1558 Y 1
SFX 1558 0 ාවලින් .
SFX 1705 Y 1
SFX 1705 0 තැන්න .
SFX 2479 Y 1
SFX 2479 0 විටම .
SFX 1446 Y 1
SFX 1446 0 කිරීමේදී .
SFX 3211 Y 1
SFX 3211 0 ැස්ම .
SFX 1581 Y 1
SFX 1581 0 සයට .
SFX 3209 Y 1
SFX 3209 0 ැස්ස .
SFX 2191 Y 1
SFX 2191 0 ්‍යයන් .
SFX 835 Y 1
SFX 835 0 ුමෙන් .
SFX 2003 Y 1
SFX 2003 0 රෙන් .
SFX 4044 Y 1
SFX 4044 0 ඥයින්ගේ .
SFX 1580 Y 1
SFX 1580 0 සයි .
SFX 1579 Y 1
SFX 1579 0 සයේ .
SFX 3815 Y 1
SFX 3815 0 ප්‍රාප්ත .
SFX 1912 Y 1
SFX 1912 0 හේන .
SFX 2954 Y 1
SFX 2954 0 ්කරයි .
SFX 3334 Y 1
SFX 3334 0 ළත් .
SFX 1437 Y 1
SFX 1437 0 චන්ද්‍ර .
SFX 191 Y 1
SFX 191 0 දැයි .
SFX 3521 Y 1
SFX 3521 0 වලියක් .
SFX 144 Y 1
SFX 144 0 මින් .
SFX 577 Y 1
SFX 577 0 මිනි .
SFX 1040 Y 1
SFX 1040 0 ාකාරයෙන් .
SFX 3909 Y 1
SFX 3909 0 ධිකරණ .
SFX 2593 Y 1
SFX 2593 0 යමින් .
SFX 4089 Y 1
SFX 4089 0 ගතිය .
SFX 1790 Y 1
SFX 1790 0 ේගම .
SFX 4563 Y 1
SFX 4563 0 ්කවි .
SFX 4655 Y 1
SFX 4655 0 ේගේ .
SFX 2824 Y 1
SFX 2824 0 කාරයින් .
SFX 4486 Y 1
SFX 4486 0 ්තේත් .
SFX 4294 Y 1
SFX 4294 0 ්ලන්තය .
SFX 2866 Y 1
SFX 2866 0 ්වමින් .
SFX 2152 Y 1
SFX 2152 0 කිරිම .
SFX 1478 Y 1
SFX 1478 0 ්නේනම් .
SFX 2133 Y 1
SFX 2133 0 ණයකට .
SFX 4475 Y 1
SFX 4475 0 ්ථාන .
SFX 3369 Y 1
SFX 3369 0 ස්හි .
SFX 685 Y 1
SFX 685 0 ණයක් .
SFX 1262 Y 1
SFX 1262 0 ණයකි .
SFX 1094 Y 1
SFX 1094 0 නයෙහි .
SFX 3361 Y 1
SFX 3361 0 හමාරක .
SFX 3056 Y 1
SFX 3056 0 ුරන් .
SFX 2682 Y 1
SFX 2682 0 නාක් .
SFX 687 Y 1
SFX 687 0 ගැන්මට .
SFX 4132 Y 1
SFX 4132 0 කාරකම් .
SFX 2787 Y 1
SFX 2787 0 ගැන්මේ .
SFX 783 Y 1
SFX 783 0 වූවා .
SFX 2799 Y 1
SFX 2799 0 ක්‍රම .
SFX 2461 Y 1
SFX 2461 0 වූවේ .
SFX 3888 Y 1
SFX 3888 0 නියක් .
SFX 4554 Y 1
SFX 4554 0 ්කොටුව .
SFX 4528 Y 1
SFX 4528 0 ්ටයි .
SFX 3889 Y 1
SFX 3889 0 නියකි .
SFX 3564 Y 1
SFX 3564 0 වතුර .
SFX 1213 Y 1
SFX 1213 0 රන් .
SFX 2311 Y 1
SFX 2311 0 ියන්ටත් .
SFX 2118 Y 1
SFX 2118 0 තොට .
SFX 1771 Y 1
SFX 1771 0 ්ඩත් .
SFX 1779 Y 1
SFX 1779 0 ්කම් .
SFX 3605 Y 1
SFX 3605 0 ලිට .
SFX 409 Y 1
SFX 409 0 ලිය .
SFX 4692 Y 1
SFX 4692 0 ෙන්නේද .
SFX 717 Y 1
SFX 717 0 වොත් .
SFX 21 Y 1
SFX 21 0 යෙන් .
SFX 199 Y 1
SFX 199 0 යෙනි .
SFX 701 Y 1
SFX 701 0 ුවෙන් .
SFX 4693 Y 1
SFX 4693 0 ෙන්නියකි .
SFX 4654 Y 1
SFX 4654 0 ේච්ඡ .
SFX 3794 Y 1
SFX 3794 0 භාවයක් .
SFX 1385 Y 1
SFX 1385 0 වරයකුට .
SFX 1957 Y 1
SFX 1957 0 වින් .
SFX 3482 Y 1
SFX 3482 0 වැසියකු .
SFX 3360 Y 1
SFX 3360 0 හරණය .
SFX 351 Y 1
SFX 351 0 ්නක් .
SFX 418 Y 1
SFX 418 0 ්නකි .
SFX 827 Y 1
SFX 827 0 ්නකු .
SFX 4437 Y 1
SFX 4437 0 ්නකෝ .
SFX 3062 Y 1
SFX 3062 0 ුම්කරුවන් .
SFX 3947 Y 1
SFX 3947 0 දානය .
SFX 1265 Y 1
SFX 1265 0 ඥයින් .
SFX 422 Y 1
SFX 422 0 වීමයි .
SFX 4976 Y 1
SFX 4976 0 ීකාරක .
SFX 4049 Y 1
SFX 4049 0 ජික .
SFX 3393 Y 1
SFX 3393 0 සීයක් .
SFX 3710 Y 1
SFX 3710 0 යයන්හි .
SFX 4609 Y 1
SFX 4609 0 ොයි .
SFX 2579 Y 1
SFX 2579 0 රණයට .
SFX 1118 Y 1
SFX 1118 0 කයන්ගේ .
SFX 3675 Y 1
SFX 3675 0 රණයේ .
SFX 2348 Y 1
SFX 2348 0 ැසෙන .
SFX 1977 Y 1
SFX 1977 0 වන්නේය .
SFX 4239 Y 1
SFX 4239 0 ්වැනියට .
SFX 4267 Y 1
SFX 4267 0 ්වයට .
SFX 1722 Y 1
SFX 1722 0 ජන .
SFX 4163 Y 1
SFX 4163 0 කත්වයට .
SFX 2180 Y 1
SFX 2180 0 ්වයි .
SFX 1433 Y 1
SFX 1433 0 ජ් .
SFX 2770 Y 1
SFX 2770 0 ජා .
SFX 4263 Y 1
SFX 4263 0 ්වයේ .
SFX 2141 Y 1
SFX 2141 0 ජි .
SFX 3613 Y 1
SFX 3613 0 ලවලට .
SFX 2722 Y 1
SFX 2722 0 දරුවන් .
SFX 2646 Y 1
SFX 2646 0 පත්වලින් .
SFX 2718 Y 1
SFX 2718 0 දාස් .
SFX 3295 Y 1
SFX 3295 0 ාධිපත්‍යය .
SFX 4162 Y 1
SFX 4162 0 කත්වයේ .
SFX 2651 Y 1
SFX 2651 0 න්විත .
SFX 4046 Y 1
SFX 4046 0 ඥයකුගේ .
SFX 2043 Y 1
SFX 2043 0 මුවා .
SFX 1491 Y 1
SFX 1491 0 ්කාර .
SFX 644 Y 1
SFX 644 0 කරගෙන .
SFX 4704 Y 1
SFX 4704 0 ෙනුදු .
SFX 1840 Y 1
SFX 1840 0 ීකරණයට .
SFX 4237 Y 1
SFX 4237 0 ්වැන්නා .
SFX 3587 Y 1
SFX 3587 0 ලොව .
SFX 2146 Y 1
SFX 2146 0 ගන්නවා .
SFX 4776 Y 1
SFX 4776 0 ුවීමක් .
SFX 2407 Y 1
SFX 2407 0 හිමි .
SFX 3624 Y 1
SFX 3624 0 ර්ථයන් .
SFX 2566 Y 1
SFX 2566 0 රුණු .
SFX 630 Y 1
SFX 630 0 ාගත .
SFX 3322 Y 1
SFX 3322 0 ාගන .
SFX 1906 Y 1
SFX 1906 0 ාගම .
SFX 957 Y 1
SFX 957 0 වටද .
SFX 3320 Y 1
SFX 3320 0 ාගල .
SFX 1983 Y 1
SFX 1983 0 වටම .
SFX 1616 Y 1
SFX 1616 0 වටය .
SFX 4469 Y 1
SFX 4469 0 ්දනය .
SFX 3745 Y 1
SFX 3745 0 මේත් .
SFX 1913 Y 1
SFX 1913 0 හුණු .
SFX 4072 Y 1
SFX 4072 0 ගැන්වීම .
SFX 1902 Y 1
SFX 1902 0 ාගෙ .
SFX 221 Y 1
SFX 221 0 ාගේ .
SFX 2370 Y 1
SFX 2370 0 ාලීමට .
SFX 4142 Y 1
SFX 4142 0 කවරයා .
SFX 2032 Y 1
SFX 2032 0 යාණන් .
SFX 3992 Y 1
SFX 3992 0 තාවයයි .
SFX 811 Y 1
SFX 811 0 ටන් .
SFX 134 Y 1
SFX 134 0 ටද .
SFX 85 Y 1
SFX 85 0 ටම .
SFX 3873 Y 1
SFX 3873 0 න්තරයක් .
SFX 201 Y 1
SFX 201 0 ටය .
SFX 307 Y 1
SFX 307 0 ට් .
SFX 1432 Y 1
SFX 1432 0 ටා .
SFX 1107 Y 1
SFX 1107 0 ටි .
SFX 750 Y 1
SFX 750 0 ටු .
SFX 1717 Y 1
SFX 1717 0 ටෝ .
SFX 2174 Y 1
SFX 2174 0 ්වීම්වලට .
SFX 3150 Y 1
SFX 3150 0 ින්නීය .
SFX 3927 Y 1
SFX 3927 0 දෙනිය .
SFX 1602 Y 1
SFX 1602 0 වලියට .
SFX 53 Y 1
SFX 53 0 යත් .
SFX 1147 Y 1
SFX 1147 0 ූවක් .
SFX 330 Y 1
SFX 330 0 කරුවකු .
SFX 2250 Y 1
SFX 2250 0 ූවකි .
SFX 1222 Y 1
SFX 1222 0 යන්ටත් .
SFX 2842 Y 1
SFX 2842 0 ඇල්ල .
SFX 1968 Y 1
SFX 1968 0 වලියේ .
SFX 3266 Y 1
SFX 3266 0 ාර්ථය .
SFX 4426 Y 1
SFX 4426 0 ්නයෙහි .
SFX 4993 Y 1
SFX 4993 0 ිස්සීම .
SFX 4547 Y 1
SFX 4547 0 ්ගයට .
SFX 3825 Y 1
SFX 3825 0 පාලිය .
SFX 2700 Y 1
SFX 2700 0 ධනය .
SFX 1662 Y 1
SFX 1662 0 පුරය .
SFX 4789 Y 1
SFX 4789 0 ුවන්ගෙන් .
SFX 2945 Y 1
SFX 2945 0 ්ගයේ .
SFX 4103 Y 1
SFX 4103 0 කුරුස .
SFX 2119 Y 1
SFX 2119 0 තුවක් .
SFX 4496 Y 1
SFX 4496 0 ්තැන .
SFX 4639 Y 1
SFX 4639 0 ේනියම් .
SFX 2905 Y 1
SFX 2905 0 ්නියකි .
SFX 3354 Y 1
SFX 3354 0 හලෙන් .
SFX 3327 Y 1
SFX 3327 0 ාංගය .
SFX 3455 Y 1
SFX 3455 0 වුවද .
SFX 4012 Y 1
SFX 4012 0 ණ්ඩු .
SFX 3912 Y 1
SFX 3912 0 ධාරියකු .
SFX 171 Y 1
SFX 171 0 වකින් .
SFX 1203 Y 1
SFX 1203 0 වකිනි .
SFX 3742 Y 1
SFX 3742 0 ම්කරු .
SFX 1644 Y 1
SFX 1644 0 රකින් .
SFX 4145 Y 1
SFX 4145 0 කරුවෙකුට .
SFX 2494 Y 1
SFX 2494 0 වර්ග .
SFX 2297 Y 1
SFX 2297 0 ිවීමත් .
SFX 2493 Y 1
SFX 2493 0 වර්ණ .
SFX 2570 Y 1
SFX 2570 0 රික .
SFX 499 Y 1
SFX 499 0 වලටත් .
SFX 264 Y 1
SFX 264 0 ීමයි .
SFX 671 Y 1
SFX 671 0 රිය .
SFX 388 Y 1
SFX 388 0 වෙක් .
SFX 3391 Y 1
SFX 3391 0 සුණි .
SFX 524 Y 1
SFX 524 0 වෙකි .
SFX 1932 Y 1
SFX 1932 0 සුණු .
SFX 523 Y 1
SFX 523 0 වෙකු .
SFX 2605 Y 1
SFX 2605 0 මුල් .
SFX 1839 Y 1
SFX 1839 0 ීත්වය .
SFX 1046 Y 1
SFX 1046 0 වේත් .
SFX 621 Y 1
SFX 621 0 ුවන් .
SFX 3553 Y 1
SFX 3553 0 වන්තයන් .
SFX 4592 Y 1
SFX 4592 0 ෝගයක් .
SFX 2974 Y 1
SFX 2974 0 ේෂ් .
SFX 4042 Y 1
SFX 4042 0 ඥයෙක් .
SFX 4043 Y 1
SFX 4043 0 ඥයෙකි .
SFX 249 Y 1
SFX 249 0 වරයකු .
SFX 598 Y 1
SFX 598 0 වනට .
SFX 2176 Y 1
SFX 2176 0 ්වීමයි .
SFX 2232 Y 1
SFX 2232 0 ේදීද .
SFX 516 Y 1
SFX 516 0 ේදීම .
SFX 490 Y 1
SFX 490 0 ේදීය .
SFX 3800 Y 1
SFX 3800 0 බෝම්බ .
