lib/hunspell-1.2.10/src/tools/dics/si_LK/dictionaries/si-LK.dic
අතු/26,56,292,410,583,637,728,1069,1212,1213,1988,2002,2003,2143
අනු/9,10,17,37,41,52,69,72,89,90,133,163,176,181,213,359,433,613,638,728,813,816,949,956,998,1117,1186,1229,1453,1636,1731,2047,2067,2076,2097,2117,2560,2613,2621,2627,2630,3366,3634,3791,3797,3808,3814,3815,4052,4102
අලුත/5,7,8,18,147,254,360,1490,2170,4236,4240,4241,4569
ආවා/4,12,98,117,149,1581,1940
ආසියා/9,10,36,45,54,82,282,444,448,1239,1456,1745,2734
කණ්ඩ/2,15,16,51,179,449,1211,3277,3283,3738
ගුරු/14,73,161,509,569,751,981,983,1254,1703,2109,3767,3927
ජයග්‍රහණය/3020
තීර/2,15,17,19,21,24,27,33,38,43,66,70,186,207,241,297,361,463,574,585,685,701,1261,1262,1431,1512,1816,2133,2256,2761,4020,4021,4022,4025,4370
දම්/61,377,859,2052,2074,3763
දික්/76,86,992,1377,1912
දේශපාලන/2,3,13,19,21,38,53,66,70,101,128,335,589,988,1264,1265,1718,1719,1720,2768,4042,4043,4044,4045,4046,4979
නිපදවන/827
නිම/4,5,11,16,20,35,52,56,58,64,76,86,87,88,102,127,131,143,145,168,172,177,180,243,253,255,265,268,274,294,302,363,443,480,550,578,713,932,1035,1357,1570,1611,1731,1750,1762,1875,1876,1885,1889,2539,2910,2911,2974,3456,4424,4426,4427,4428,4628,4629
නිරත/52,64,87,88,131,143,145,156,189,212,293,702,719,784,791,2517,4816
පවති/191,885,1134,1763,2178,2704
පසු/2,6,24,86,161,172,244,253,274,276,456,536,612,689,887,891,895,1111,1234,1235,1663,1743,2069,2077,2625,2820,3738,3834,3997,4076,4120
පැල/1,2,3,4,5,17,24,29,42,59,64,87,99,102,172,216,307,447,937,1005,1755,2900,3208,3209,3228,3952,4291,4292,4398
ප්‍රිය/259,562,565,578,628,686,819,900,1172,1388,1740,2608,2659,3307
බද්ද/1,4,10,22,1790
බුබුල/24,385,3336
මහජන/1002
මාස/2,3,5,13,15,17,19,21,26,29,38,43,46,49,60,66,70,128,139,185,199,250,318,383,493,589,1312,2218,2219,2249,2901,4277
මිටි/2,13,15,30,38,43,48,82,2029
යුද/15,101,677,1295,1738,1959
යෙදු/8,9,10,15,33,35,36,52,71,82,95,98,106,142,158,256,306,370,387,471,717,880,1013,1674,1713,2128,2603,2759,2994,2998,3022,4707
රත්/64,183,217,253,274,447,565,1213,1744,1981,2052,2074,2118
ලෙස/1,2,5,6,8,11,12,18,28,31,85,127,134,150,201,211,254,308,376,811,842,1099,1758,2219,3146
වයර්/2549,2611
වැඩි/143,194,253,273,293,427,444,565,721,724,815,864,975,1372,1380,1446,1460,1587,1688,1690,1946,2049,2108,2409,2475,2709,2830,3788
වැල/1,3,4,5,16,32,367,389,616,624,710,756,771,925,1003,1088,2082,2151,2184,2333,2362,2810,2811,2815,3819
වැවිල/2340,3191
විචිත්‍ර/137,205,297,663,720,1200
විම/1,4,5,33,56,69,168,434,570,610,632,714,1045,1185,1426,1577,1899,2120,2348,2418,2438,3085,3086,3212,3213,3401,4171,4906
විය/1,3,7,9,20,32,33,34,69,79,83,91,117,118,149,219,233,240,244,367,459,516,549,601,728,1065,1076,1251,1255,1304,1435,1573,1677,1911,2361,2669,2962,3085,3086,3290,3321,3333,3351,3631,3633,3959,3960,4573,4650,4716
වේග/2,7,13,15,19,21,33,39,42,48,66,102,185,199,442,1200,1202,1312,3237
වේල/1,3,4,5,8,16,17,20,21,28,32,42,85,144,180,255,363,375,419,442,443,520,550,616,627,646,700,713,756,766,1003,1035,1169,1825,1880,1884,2230,2331,2365,2377,2879,3249,3254,4286,4300
වේල්/1579
ශෝක/2,15,19,21,42,686,791,1036,1565,1898,3815
සවි/2,13,53,78,86,172,253,274,298,457,564,814,3379
සැක/2,4,11,13,19,21,27,46,48,60,86,136,166,236,260,330,365,371,409,415,458,565,570,690,926,968,995,1044,1045,1181,1335,1555,1577,1578,1930,1932,1933,1934,1935,1957,2348,2418,2419,2420,2423,3113,3210,3211,3212,3388,3391,3394,3395,3404,3747,4166
සිර/16,18,51,64,86,87,88,90,93,145,166,179,236,241,288,302,315,330,353,365,371,375,458,624,644,706,772,813,858,899,923,933,993,994,995,997,1021,1233,1271,1723,1850,1920,2293,2308,2309,2326,3144,3172,4103,4145
සුමන/20,377,421,451,715,862,949,1170,1437,1562,1619,2140
ස්වභාව/2,13,15,19,21,27,43,46,48,53,60,62,128,427,589,936,1872,2343,3190,3951
හවුල/1,3,4,5,237,829,856,910,1491,2185
හැඬ/24,59,64,76,80,189,367,465,835
හැම/1,5,20,24,42,59,79,276,327,975,2225,2479
හිට/9,24,56,63,126,179,209,290,301,393,495,517,839,1027,1028,1159,1160,1339,1498,1509,1529,1549,1851,1852,3037,3155
හින්ද/11,16,20,24,95,119,149,231,765,918,1324,3028,4908
හිඳ/42,63,208,375,476,517,581,588,841,1027,1343,1860
හේතු/9,172,1229,1453,2803,4755
හෝර්ටන්/1705
